Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 27 Adjudication of Obscene Publications

12-27-1.
Authority of attorney general.

Whenever the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that a person is engaged in the sale, exhibition, or commercial distribution of any obscene book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material, the attorney general may institute a proceeding in the superior court in the county in which the sale, exhibition, or commercial distribution of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material occurs for an adjudication of the obscenity of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-31.1-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-2.
Contents of petition.

The proceedings shall be instituted by filing with the court a petition:

Directed against the book, print, picture, films, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballard, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material;

Alleging its obscene nature; and

Listing the names and addresses if known, of the author, publisher, and all other persons interested in its sale, exhibition, or commercial distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-2; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-3.
Court examination — Order of notice.

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to §

12-27-2

, the court shall immediately examine the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material alleged to be obscene. If an examination is not possible, the court may rely upon sworn allegations contained in the petition. If the court finds no probable cause to believe that the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the court finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene, the court may issue an order of notice returnable in or within thirty (30) days, directed against the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photographs, figment, or other material by name or suitable identity, and addressed to all persons interested in the publication, sale, distribution, or exhibition of it. The petition shall then come on for a hearing to determine whether or not the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene. Notice of the order shall be published once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county or city in which the proceeding is filed, and if their names and addresses are known a copy of the order shall be served by registered mail upon the author, publisher, exhibitor, and all other persons interested in the sale or commercial distribution of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-3; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-4.
Restraining order.

When an order of notice is issued pursuant to §

12-27-3

, the court may issue a temporary restraining order against the sale, exhibition, or commercial distribution of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material alleged to be obscene; and in that event, the matter shall be heard on the question of whether or not the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene one day after the joinder of issue, and the court shall render a decision within forty-eight (48) hours of the conclusion of the hearing. If, in the event that a restraining order is issued, no hearing on the question of obscenity is commenced within one day after the joinder of issue through no fault of the respondent, or within forty-eight (48) hours of the conclusion of the hearing no decision is rendered by the court, the restraining order shall expire and it shall not be renewed. In determining the time periods set forth in this section, Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays shall not be counted, and the court shall not be required to hear matters on those days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-4; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-5.
Parties to hearing.

On or before the return date specified in the order of notice issued pursuant to §

12-27-3

, the author, publisher, and any person interested in the sale, exhibition, or commercial distribution of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material may appear and file an answer. The court shall by order permit any other person or persons, not to exceed five (5), to appear and file answers as amicus curiae. In the absence of any other answer having been filed in the court, amicus curiae may participate in hearings thereafter as a party or parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-5; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-6.
Unanswered cases.

If no one appears and files an answer on or before the return date specified in the order of notice, the court, upon being satisfied that the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene, may order the clerk of court to enter a decree or order that the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material is obscene, but the court, in its discretion, may except from its decree a restricted category of persons to whom the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material may be exhibited, sold, or distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-6; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-7.
Hearing in answered case.

If an appearance is entered and an answer filed, the court shall order the proceedings set on the calendar for a prompt hearing, which in the event a temporary restraining order has been issued, shall occur within the time limit specifically set forth in §

12-27-4

. The court shall conduct the hearing in accordance with the rules of civil procedure applicable to the trial of cases by the court without a jury. At the hearing, the court shall receive evidence, pertaining to the obscenity involved, as the term “obscene” is defined in §

11-31-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-7; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-8.
Written decision of court.

In making a decision on the obscenity of the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material, the court shall consider, among other things, the evidence offered pursuant to §

12-27-7

, if any, and shall make a written determination upon every consideration relied upon in the proceeding in its findings of fact and conclusions of law or in a memorandum accompanying them. No book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material shall be found to be obscene unless the court expressly finds it to be obscene beyond a reasonable doubt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-8; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-9.
Decree in answered case — Automatic vacation of restraining order.

If the court finds the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material not obscene, the court shall order the clerk of the court to enter a decree or order accordingly. If it finds the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material obscene, the court shall order the clerk of the court to enter a decree or order to that effect, but the court, in its discretion, may except from its judgment a restricted category of persons to whom the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material may be sold, exhibited, or distributed.

In the event that a restraining order has been entered pursuant to §

12-27-4

, it shall be automatically vacated if no decree or order is entered within three (3) days after the conclusion of the hearing on the merits or if a decree or order that the material is not obscene is entered within that period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-9; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-10.
Sale while order or decree in effect.

While a temporary restraining order made pursuant to §

12-27-4

is in effect, or after the entry of a decree or order pursuant to §

12-27-6

, or after the entry of a decree or order pursuant to §

12-27-9(a)

, any person who sells, exhibits, commercially distributes, or commercially publishes or who has the book, print, picture, film, motion picture film, magazine, pamphlet, ballad, printed paper, written material, photograph, figment, or other material with intent to sell, exhibit, or commercially distribute or commercially publish it, is presumed to have knowledge that it is obscene under chapter 31 of title 11.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-10; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-11.
Appeals.

Any party to the proceeding, including the petitioner, may appeal to the supreme court, as provided by law, from the decree or order of the court entered pursuant to §

12-27-9(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-11; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-27-12.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to be a necessary prerequisite to the filing of criminal charges under any other statute.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 257, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 11-31.1-12; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.